Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.212

Medical program directors—Certification.

The secretary of the department of health, in conjunction with the state emergency medical services and trauma care committee, shall evaluate, certify and terminate certification of medical program directors, and prescribe minimum standards defining duties and responsibilities and performance of duties and responsibilities.

[ 1990 c 269 s 19; 1986 c 68 s 2.]